Utah statutes.
76-10-2301.   Contributing to the delinquency of a minor -- Definitions -- Penalties.

(1)  For purposes of this part:

(a)  "Adult" means a person 18 years of age or older.

(b)  "Minor" means a person younger than 18 years of age.

(2)  Any adult who commits any act or engages in any conduct which he knows or should know would have the effect of causing or encouraging a minor to commit an act which would be a misdemeanor or infraction criminal violation of any federal or state statute or any county or municipal ordinance if committed by an adult is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(3)  A violation of Subsection (2) does not require that the minor be found to be delinquent or to have committed a delinquent act.

(4)  An offense committed under Subsection (2) is in addition to any completed or inchoate offense which the actor may have committed personally or as a party.

